Connecticut, session 2026, SB00347.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (f) of section 31-273 of the general statutes is
2 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
3 1, 2026):
4 (f) Any person who knowingly makes a false statement or
5 representation or fails to disclose a material fact in order to obtain,
6 increase, prevent or decrease any benefit, contribution or other payment
7 under this chapter, or under any similar law of another state or of the
8 United States in regard to which this state acted as agent pursuant to an
9 agreement authorized by section 31-225, whether to be made to or by
10 [himself or herself] such person or any other person, and who receives
11 any such benefit, pays any such contribution or alters any such payment
12 to [his or her] such person's advantage by such fraudulent means (1)
13 shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor if such benefit, contribution or
14 payment amounts to [five hundred] two thousand dollars or less, or (2)
SB347 / File No. 82 1

SB347 File No. 82
15 shall be guilty of a class D felony if such benefit, contribution or
16 payment amounts to more than [five hundred] two thousand dollars.
17 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 54-193, no person shall be
18 prosecuted for a violation of the provisions of this subsection committed
19 on or after October 1, 1977, except within five years next after such
20 violation has been committed.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 31-273(f)
LAB Joint Favorable
SB347 / File No. 82 2

SB347 File No. 82
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Resources of the General Fund GF - Potential Minimal Minimal
Revenue Gain
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which increases the dollar threshold for felony
unemployment compensation fraud from $500 to $2,000, results in a
minimal potential revenue gain in FY 27 and FY 28. By reclassifying
fraud overpayments in amounts greater than $500 but less than $2,000
from a class D felony to a class A misdemeanor, the bill decreases the
maximum fine that may be imposed for these offenses, but if this change
increases the frequency with which these fines are imposed, the revenue
collected under this statute may be greater than previous years.1 This
bill is not anticipated to affect the number of persons incarcerated or the
number of persons under supervision in the community.
Finally, this bill does not result in any fiscal impact to the Department
of Labor (DOL) as the change in classification is not expected to affect
workload for the agency. As background, DOL reported that 1,992 fraud
overpayments were for amounts greater than $500 but less than $2,000
in 2025.
1 In the past four years, the state has not collected any revenue from fines under CGS
31-273.
SB347 / File No. 82 3

SB347 File No. 82
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the number of fines imposed.
SB347 / File No. 82 4

SB347 File No. 82
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 347
AN ACT INCREASING THE THRESHOLD AMOUNT FOR FELONY
UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION FRAUD.